Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2304
Members; terms; compensation.

The appointment of the air conditioning air distribution board shall be for staggered terms of three years as provided by the city council or board of trustees of the respective city or village with the appointments to be made in December of each year. Compensation shall be determined by the city council or chairman and board of trustees.

Laws 1969, c. 98, § 4, p. 469.